Utah statutes.
54-8a-3.   Information filed with county clerk.
(1)  An operator shall file with the county clerk of a county in which the
operator has an underground facility the following:
(a)  the name of each municipality, city, or town in which the operator has an
underground facility within that county;
(b)  the operator's name;
(c)  the title, telephone number, and address of the operator's representative
designated to receive calls regarding excavation; and
(d)  a statement concerning whether the operator is a member of an association
and, if the operator is a member of an association, the name of and contact
information for the association.
(2)  In a county where an association is established, the association shall
file its telephone number and a list of its members who are operators with the
county clerk on behalf of any participating operator.
